Florida, session 2026, SB1286.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 38 39 Section 1.âSection 445.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 40 read: 41 445.08âFlorida Law Enforcement Officer and Firefighter 42 Recruitment Bonus Payment Program.â 43 (1)âAs used in For the purposes of this section, the term: 44 (a)ââBreak in serviceâ means: 45 1.âA period of time during which a person is employed with 46 a Florida criminal justice agency or fire service provider but 47 is not employed as a full-time law enforcement officer or 48 firefighter; or 49 2.âA period of time during which a person is in between 50 employment as a full-time law enforcement officer or firefighter 51 lasting no longer than 15 days. 52 53 The time period for any break in service does not count toward 54 satisfying the 2-year full-time employment requirement of this 55 section. 56 (b)(a)ââCommissionâ means the Criminal Justice Standards 57 and Training Commission within the Department of Law 58 Enforcement. 59 (c)(b)ââEmploying agencyâ has the same meaning as provided 60 in s. 943.10(4). 61 (d)ââFire service providerâ has the same meaning as in s. 62 633.102(13). 63 (e)ââFirefighterâ has the same meaning as in s. 633.102(9). 64 (f)(c)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 65 provided in s. 943.10(1). 66 (g)ââNewly employed firefighterâ means a person who gains 67 or is appointed to full-time employment as a certified 68 firefighter with a fire service provider on or after July 1, 69 2026, and who has never been previously employed as a 70 firefighter in this state. 71 (h)(d)ââNewly employed officerâ means a person who gains or 72 is appointed to full-time employment as a certified law 73 enforcement officer with a Florida criminal justice employing 74 agency on or after July 1, 2022, and who has never before been 75 employed as a law enforcement officer in this state. 76 (i)(e)ââProgramâ means the Florida Law Enforcement Officer 77 and Firefighter Recruitment Bonus Payment Program. 78 (2)(a)âThere is created within the department the Florida 79 Law Enforcement Officer and Firefighter Recruitment Bonus 80 Payment Program to aid in the recruitment of law enforcement 81 officers and firefighters within the state. The purpose of the 82 program is to administer one-time bonus payments of up to $5,000 83 to each newly employed officer and newly employed firefighter 84 within the state. 85 (b)âBonus payments provided to eligible newly employed 86 officers and newly employed firefighters are contingent upon 87 legislative appropriations and shall be prorated subject to the 88 amount appropriated for the program. 89 (3)âEach bonus payment shall be adjusted to include 7.65 90 percent for the officerâs or firefighterâs share of Federal 91 Insurance Contribution Act tax on the payment. 92 (4)âThe department shall develop an annual plan for the 93 administration of the program and distribution of bonus 94 payments. Applicable employing agencies and fire service 95 providers shall assist the department with the collection of any 96 data necessary to determine bonus payment amounts and to 97 distribute the bonus payments, and shall otherwise provide the 98 department with any information or assistance needed to fulfill 99 the requirements of this section. At a minimum, the plan must 100 include: 101 (a)âThe method for determining the estimated number of 102 newly employed officers and newly employed firefighters to gain 103 or be appointed to full-time employment during the applicable 104 fiscal year. 105 (b)âThe minimum eligibility requirements a newly employed 106 officer and newly employed firefighter must meet to receive and 107 retain a bonus payment, which must include: 108 1.âObtaining certification for employment or appointment as 109 a law enforcement officer under pursuant to s. 943.1395 or as a 110 firefighter under s. 633.408. 111 2.âGaining full-time employment with a Florida criminal 112 justice agency or a fire service provider. 113 3.âMaintaining full-time employment as a law enforcement 114 officer with a Florida criminal justice agency or as a 115 firefighter with a fire service provider for at least 2 years 116 after from the date on which the officer or firefighter obtained 117 certification. The required 2-year employment period may be 118 satisfied by maintaining full-time employment at one or more 119 employing agencies or fire service providers, but such period 120 must not contain any break in service longer than 180 calendar 121 days. 122 (c)âThe standards by which the department will determine 123 under what circumstances a break in service is acceptable. A law 124 enforcement officer or firefighter must provide documentation to 125 the department justifying a break in service. For purposes of 126 this section, the term âbreak in serviceâ means a period of time 127 during which the person is employed with a Florida criminal 128 justice agency but is not employed as a full-time law 129 enforcement officer or a period of time during which the person 130 is in between employment as a full-time law enforcement officer 131 for no longer than 15 days. The time period for any break in 132 service does not count toward satisfying the 2-year full-time 133 employment requirement of this section. 134 (d)âThe method that will be used to determine the bonus 135 payment amount to be distributed to each newly employed officer 136 and newly employed firefighter. 137 (e)âThe method that will be used to distribute bonus 138 payments to applicable employing agencies and fire service 139 providers for distribution to eligible officers and 140 firefighters. Such method should prioritize distributing bonus 141 payments to eligible officers and firefighters in the most 142 efficient and quickest manner possible. 143 (f)âThe estimated cost to the department associated with 144 developing and administering the program and distributing bonus 145 payment funds. 146 (g)âThe method by which an officer or a firefighter must 147 reimburse the state if he or she received a bonus payment under 148 the program, but failed to maintain continuous employment for 149 the required 2-year period. Reimbursement may shall not be 150 required if an officer or a firefighter is discharged by his or 151 her employing agency or fire service provider for a reason other 152 than misconduct as designated on the affidavit of separation 153 completed by the employing agency or fire service provider and 154 maintained by the commission. 155 156 The department may establish other criteria deemed necessary to 157 determine bonus payment eligibility and distribution. 158 (5)âThe department shall consult quarterly with the 159 commission and the Division of State Fire Marshal to verify the 160 certification of newly employed officers and newly employed 161 firefighters and affidavits of separation submitted to the 162 commission and Division of State Fire Marshal which detail 163 officer or firefighter misconduct. The Division of State Fire 164 Marshal shall define by rule firefighter misconduct. 165 (6)âThe department shall submit the plan to the Executive 166 Office of the Governorâs Office of Policy and Budget, the chair 167 of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the chair of the 168 House Appropriations Committee by October 1 of each year. The 169 department is authorized to submit budget amendments pursuant to 170 chapter 216 as necessary to release appropriated funds for 171 distribution to applicable employing agencies and fire service 172 providers under this program. 173 (7)âThe funding allocation for the bonus payments must be 174 used solely to comply with the requirements of this section, but 175 applicable collective bargaining units are not otherwise 176 precluded from wage negotiation. 177 (8)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 178 section. 179 (9)âThis section expires July 1, 2028 2026. 180 Section 2.âSection 633.134, Florida Statutes, is amended to 181 read: 182 633.134âGifts and grants; grant review panel.â 183 (1)âThe division may accept for any of its purposes and 184 functions any donations of property and grants of money from any 185 governmental unit, public agency, institution, person, firm, or 186 corporation. Such moneys shall be deposited, disbursed, and 187 administered in a trust fund as provided by law. 188 (2)(a)âThe Chief Financial Officer may appoint review 189 panels to assist in the grant review process. A review panel 190 must consist of five members from the fire service industry or 191 other professions that involve the specific industry or program 192 for which the panel has been appointed. Each member of a review 193 panel is appointed to a 1-year term. 194 (b)âEach review panel must review and score grant 195 applications and recommend to the department which applicants 196 should be awarded a grant. Each panel must submit to the 197 department a list of eligible applicants by score. 198 (c)âEach review panel must hold a forum for public comment 199 before recommending a grant application. 200 (d)âEach review panel must review the lists of eligible 201 applicants for a grant and create two lists, one of which must 202 consist of recommendations for eligible applicants for general 203 program support grants and one of which must consist of 204 recommendations for eligible applicants for specific fire 205 project grants, and submit the lists to the Chief Financial 206 Officer. 207 (e)âA general program support grant or a specific fire 208 program grant includes, but is not limited to, all of the 209 following: 210 1.âGrants for the purchase, replacement, or maintenance of 211 operational equipment and resources, including, but not limited 212 to, fire apparatuses, personal protective equipment, 213 communication systems, rescue tools, and other essential 214 firefighting and emergency response equipment. 215 2.âGrants pertaining to fixed capital outlay, grants and 216 aids, and grants and aids to local governments and nonstate 217 entities-fixed capital outlay, as those terms are defined in s. 218 216.011(1), and the construction or remodel of fire departments. 219 3.âGrants to support state-coordinated outreach programs 220 such as mobile fire safety exhibits, educational tours, and 221 statewide fire awareness campaigns. An outreach program must 222 prioritize grant funds to Florida-based fire departments, safety 223 educators, and emergency personnel and promote best practices in 224 fire prevention, public safety, and emergency preparedness. 225 4.âGrants or stipends for individual firefighters or fire 226 service instructors selected through a competitive process based 227 on merit, leadership, or innovation in fire safety. Grant funds 228 may support training, research, or professional exchange 229 opportunities that advance public safety practices in this 230 state. 231 5.âGrants for programs or projects that advance the mission 232 of fire prevention and emergency response, including, but not 233 limited to, firefighter health and wellness initiatives, 234 emergency planning and coordination systems, public safety 235 communications upgrades, or community preparedness efforts. A 236 program or project must clearly demonstrate alignment with the 237 goals of this subsection and provide measurable public safety 238 outcomes. 239 6.âGrants for programs or projects that advance the mission 240 of arson prevention, arson investigation, juvenile arson 241 prevention, arson intervention programs, and police canine 242 programs. Eligible recipients include entities that investigate 243 or prevent arson. As used in this subparagraph, the term âpolice 244 canineâ has the same meaning as in s. 401.254(1). 245 (f)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall review the review 246 panelâs recommendations and, beginning January 1, 2027, submit a 247 list of approved applicants to be included in the departmentâs 248 legislative budget request. Projects from the Chief Financial 249 Officerâs approved list must be funded by score until all 250 appropriated funds are depleted. 251 (g)âThe division shall adopt rules to implement and 252 administer this subsection, including rules establishing: 253 1.âEligibility criteria and the scoring rubric for the 254 awarding of grants. 255 2.âParticular grant programs or projects, categories of 256 grants, and procedures necessary for the prudent administration 257 of the grant programs or projects. 258 Section 3.âSection 633.1424, Florida Statutes, is created 259 to read: 260 633.1424âInstitute for Posttraumatic Stress Disorder.â 261 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 262 (a)ââFirst responderâ has the same meaning as in s. 263 125.01045(2). 264 (b)ââPublic safety agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 265 365.172(3). 266 (2)âSubject to appropriation, the Institute for 267 Posttraumatic Stress Disorder is established within the 268 Department of Financial Services to serve as a statewide center 269 for research, training, outreach, and program development in 270 support of first responder behavioral health. The purpose of the 271 institute is to strengthen the mental resilience and well-being 272 of the stateâs public safety workforce through coordination of 273 research, training initiatives, public outreach, and policy 274 guidance. 275 (3)âThe institute must do all of the following: 276 (a)âCoordinate statewide research efforts on behavioral 277 health issues, including suicide prevention, burnout reduction, 278 and resilience-building, which affect first responders. 279 (b)âDevelop and disseminate evidence-informed best 280 practices and policy recommendations relating to first responder 281 behavioral health. 282 (c)âFacilitate training programs and technical assistance 283 in behavioral health initiatives for public safety agencies. 284 (d)âServe as a central hub for public outreach and 285 awareness campaigns aimed at improving mental health outcomes 286 for first responders. 287 (e)âEvaluate behavioral health programs and initiatives to 288 measure their effectiveness and their impact on first 289 responders. 290 (4)âThe initiative may collaborate with public and private 291 partners, including, but not limited to, Florida College System 292 institutions, state universities, public safety agencies, mental 293 health providers, and community organizations, to enhance 294 program development and service delivery. 295 (5)âThe division shall adopt rules to implement this 296 section. 297 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.